Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6110
Conversion.

The director shall issue a certificate of authority to a new stock insurer when the mutual insurer files a certificate with the director stating that all of the conditions set forth in the plan of conversion have been satisfied so long as the board of directors of the mutual insurer has not abandoned the plan of conversion pursuant to section 44-6114. The conversion shall be effective upon the issuance of a certificate of authority by the director. Upon issuance of the certificate of authority, the insurer's articles of incorporation shall be treated as amended in compliance with section 44-231.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 50.